Ohio, session 136, HB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 122.1712 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 122.1712. (A) The Ohio Israel Trade and Innovation Partnership is created. The partnership shall study potential means of advancing the following: (1) Bilateral trade and investment between Ohio and Israel; (2) Policy issues of mutual interest to Ohio and Israel; (3) Business and academic exchanges between Ohio and Israel; (4) Mutual economic support between Ohio and Israel; (5) Mutual investment in the infrastructure of Ohio and Israel; (6) Specific industries, emerging technology opportunities and, innovation clusters that warrant support from Ohio and Israel; (7) Multilateral partnerships between Ohio, Israel, and other nations regarding the industries, emerging technology opportunities, or innovation clusters identified in division (A)(6) of this section, such as partnerships between Israel and nations in Africa, Asia, Europe, members of the Gulf cooperation council, and Oceania; (8) Other issues as determined by the partnership. (B) The partnership shall consist of the following members: (1) Three members of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, who have knowledge of, or current or past involvement in, organizations that promote Israeli affairs, or have interest in the well-being of trade relations between Ohio and Israel, two of whom are members of the majority party and one of whom is a member of the minority party; (2) Three members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who have knowledge of, or current or past involvement in, organizations that promote Israeli affairs, or have interest in the well-being of trade relations between Ohio and Israel, two of whom are members of the majority party and one of whom is a member of the minority party; (3) Eight members appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, who shall include the following: (a) One member who represents a state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) One member who represents the Ohio chamber of commerce or a successor organization that advances business interests in this state; (c) One member who represents the nonprofit corporation Ohio Jewish communities; (d) One member who represents the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code; (e) Two members who represent a regional affiliate of the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code; (f) Two members, who represent Ohio's business community, from any of the following organizations: (i) An Ohio local chamber of commerce; (ii) Ohio business roundtable; (iii) Ohio manufacturers' association; (iv) Ohio life sciences. (6) Three ex-officio members as follows: (a) The chancellor of higher education; (b) The director of development; (c) The lieutenant governor. (C) Members of the partnership shall be appointed not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section. Members of the partnership appointed under divisions (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall serve terms of two years or for the remainder of the member's legislative term, whichever is less. Members of the partnership appointed under division (B)(3) of this section shall serve terms of four years. Any vacancy on the partnership shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (D) Members of the partnership shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties, within the limits of funds available to the partnership for such purposes. (E)(1) The partnership shall meet and hold hearings at the places it designates throughout the state. (2) The partnership shall elect a chairperson from among the members of the partnership. The chairperson may appoint from the partnership members of subcommittees and subcommittee chairpersons at the chairperson's discretion. (3) A majority of the members of the partnership constitutes a quorum for the transaction of the business of the partnership. (F) Not later than fifteen months after the effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, the partnership shall issue a report of its activities during the preceding year, and any associated findings and recommendations, to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives.